Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
§ 39-15-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Lodging service” means the provision of sleeping accommodations to transient guests and shall include the providing of sites for the placement of tents, campers, trailers, mobile homes or other mobile sleeping accommodations for transient guests;

“Lodging tax” means the excise tax imposed on lodging services;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2.

“Quarterly return” means a tax return for each of four (4) periods of three (3) consecutive months in a calendar year beginning with January, April, July or October;

“Real property” means land and appurtenances, including structures affixed thereto. An article shall be considered real property if:

It is buried or embedded; or

It is physically or constructively annexed to the real property; and

It is adapted to the use of the real property; and

Considering the purpose for which the annexation was made, one can reasonably infer that it was the intent of the annexing party to make the article a permanent part of the real property.

“Retail sale” means any sale, lease or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease or subrent;

“Sale” means any transfer of title or possession in this state for a consideration including the fabrication of tangible personal property when the materials are furnished by the purchaser but excluding an exchange or transfer of tangible personal property upon which the seller or lessor has directly or indirectly paid sales or use tax incidental to:

A division of partnership assets among the partners according to their interests in the partnership. As used in this subparagraph, “partnership” includes a limited partnership;

The formation of a corporation by the owners of a business and the transfer of their business assets to the corporation in exchange for all the corporation’s outstanding stock, except qualifying shares, in proportion to assets contributed;

The transfer of assets of shareholders in the formation or dissolution of professional corporations;

The dissolution and the pro rata distribution of the corporation’s assets to its stockholders;

The transfer of assets from a parent corporation to a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the subsidiary corporation;

The transfer of assets from a subsidiary corporation which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation to a parent corporation or to another subsidiary which is owned at least eighty percent (80%) by the parent corporation, which transfer is solely in exchange for stock or securities of the parent corporation or the subsidiary which received the assets;

A transfer of a partnership interest;

The formation of a partnership by the transfer of assets to the partnership or transfers to a partnership in exchange for proportionate interests in the partnership;

The repossession of personal property by a chattel mortgage holder or foreclosure by a lienholder;

The transfer of assets between parent and closely held subsidiary corporations, or between subsidiary corporations closely held by the same parent corporation, or between affiliated companies, partnerships and corporations which are owned in similar percentages by the same persons. “Closely held subsidiary corporation” means a corporation in which the parent corporation owns stock possessing at least eighty percent (80%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote and owns at least eighty percent (80%) of the total number of shares of all other classes of stock;

The lease or rental of tangible personal property for consideration between parent and closely held subsidiary corporations, between subsidiary corporations closely held by the same parent corporation, or between affiliated companies, partnerships, corporations or other business entities which are owned in similar percentages by the same persons. As used in this subparagraph, “closely held subsidiary corporation” means a corporation in which the parent corporation owns stock possessing at least eighty percent (80%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote and owns at least eighty percent (80%) of the total number of shares of all other classes of stock;

The sale of a business entity when sold to a purchaser of all or not less than eighty percent (80%) of the value of all of the assets which are located in this state of the business entity when the purchaser continues to use the tangible personal property in the operation of an ongoing business entity in this state. As used in subparagraphs (M) and (N) of this section, “business entity” means and includes an individual, partnership, corporation, corporate division, joint stock company or any other association or entity, public or private, or separate business unit thereof.

“Sales price”:

Shall apply to the measure subject to sales tax and means the total amount or consideration, including cash, credit, property and services for which personal property or services are sold, leased or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction for the following:

The seller’s cost of property sold;

The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller and any other expense of the seller;

Charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale other than delivery and installation charges;

Delivery charges;

Installation charges;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 10, § 2.

Shall not include:

Discounts, including cash, terms or coupons which are not reimbursed by a third party, which are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;

Interest, financing and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of personal property or services, if the amount is separate stated on the invoice, bill of sale or similar document given to the purchaser; and

Any tax legally imposed directly on the consumer which is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale or similar document given to the purchaser.

“Sales price” shall include consideration received by the seller from third parties if:

The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly related to the price reduction or discount on the sale;

The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;

The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and

One (1) of the following criteria is met:

The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon certificate or documentation is authorized, distributed or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate or documentation is presented;

The purchaser identifies himself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount. A preferred customer card that is available to any patron shall not constitute membership in such a group; or

The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate or other documentation presented by the purchaser.

“Tangible personal property” means all personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. “Tangible personal property” includes electricity, water, gas, steam and prewritten computer software; and includes any controlled substances as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv) which are not sold pursuant to a written prescription of or through a licensed practitioner as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xx);

“Taxpayer” means the purchaser of tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under this article;

“Tertiary production” means the crude oil recovered from a petroleum reservoir by means of a tertiary enhanced recovery project to which one (1) or more tertiary enhanced recovery techniques meeting the certification requirements of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission or the United States government are being applied;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Transportable home” means and includes the following as defined:

“Modular home” means a residential dwelling constructed in a factory to a residential construction code other than the Federal Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards;

“Prebuilt home” means any residential dwelling that is wholly, or in substantial part, made, fabricated, formed or assembled in manufacturing facilities for installation or assembly on a building site. Prebuilt home shall include, but not be limited to, a manufactured home, modular home and mobile home;

“Manufactured home” means a residential dwelling built in accordance with the Federal Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards which is a unit more than eight and one-half (8 1/2) feet in width which is designed, constructed and equipped as a dwelling place or place of business to which wheels may be attached for movement upon streets or highways. Transportable homes are not included within the meanings of trailer houses or trailers.

“Transient guest” means a guest who remains for less than thirty (30) continuous days;

“Vendor” means any person engaged in the business of selling at retail or wholesale tangible personal property, admissions or services which are subject to taxation under this article. “Vendor” includes a vehicle dealer as defined by W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xviii), a remote seller to the extent provided by W.S.

39-15-501

and a marketplace facilitator to the extent provided by W.S.

39-15-502

;

“Wholesale sale” means a sale of tangible personal property or services to a vendor for subsequent sale;

“Delivery charge” means a charge by the seller for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including, but not limited to, transportation, shipping, handling, postage, crating and packing;

“Well site” means an area where production equipment is installed to store or prepare oil or gas for transportation off the well site. Production equipment includes, but is not limited to, wellheads, valves, tanks, dehydrators, heater-treaters, separators, flow lines, meters, flares, vapor recovery units and emission equipment. Except as provided in this paragraph, production equipment for purposes of defining a well site shall not include compressors, off well site gathering lines and processing facilities;

“Directly and predominantly in manufacturing” means an item manufactured from inventoried raw or prepared material beginning at the point at which raw or prepared material is moved from plant inventory on a contiguous plant site and ending at a point at which manufacturing has altered the raw or prepared material to its completed form, including packaging, if required. Machinery used during the manufacturing process to move material from one direct production step to another in a continuous flow and machinery used in testing during the manufacturing process shall be deemed to be used directly and predominantly in manufacturing;

“Machinery” means all tangible personal property eligible for a sales tax exemption pursuant to W.S.

39-15-105

(a)(viii)(O), used to produce an article of tangible personal property. The term includes both the basic unit and any adjunct or attachment necessary for the basic unit to accomplish its intended function, the materials for the construction or repair of machinery, and machine tools;

“Manufacturing” means the operation of producing a new product, article, substance or commodity different from and having a distinctive nature, character or use from the raw or prepared material;

“NAICS” means the Northern American Industry Classification System manual of 2002 that organizes establishments into industries on the basis of the activity in which they are primarily engaged;

“Certified automated system” means software certified under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate state and maintain a record of the transaction;

“Certified service provider” means an agent certified under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement to perform all the seller’s sales and use tax functions, other than the seller’s obligation to remit tax on its own purchases;

“Computer” means an electronic device that accepts information in a digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on a sequence of instructions;

“Computer software” means a set of coded instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform a task;

“Delivered electronically” means delivered to the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media;

“Drug” means a compound, substance or preparation, and any component of a compound, substance or preparation, other than food and food ingredients, dietary supplements or alcoholic beverages:

Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or a supplement to any of them;

Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease; or

Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body.

“Durable medical equipment” means equipment including its repair and replacement parts which:

Can withstand repeated use;

Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury;

Is not worn in or on the body;

Does not include “mobility enhancing equipment”.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities;

“Intangible personal property” includes:

Money and cash on hand including currency, gold, silver and other coin, specie and specie legal tender as provided in W.S.

9-4-1304

, bank drafts, certified checks and cashier’s checks;

Money on deposit;

Accounts receivable and other credits;

Bonds, promissory notes, debentures and other evidences of debt;

Shares of stock or other written evidence of ownership;

Judgments for the payment of money;

Annuities and annuity contracts.

“Lease” or “rental” means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property for consideration for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A lease or rental may include future options to purchase or extend the lease or rental. “Lease” or “rental” shall include any agreement covering a motor vehicle or trailer where the amount of consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount realized upon sale or disposition of the property as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 7701(h)(l). The definitions in this paragraph shall be used for sales and use tax purposes regardless of whether a transaction is characterized as a lease or rental under generally accepted accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, the Uniform Commercial Code, or other applicable provisions of federal, state or local law. “Lease” or “rental” shall not include:

A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments;

A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of required payments and payment of an option price which does not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or one percent (1%) of the total required payments; or

Providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time, with the condition that the operator is necessary for the equipment to perform as designed. For purposes of this subparagraph, an operator shall do more than maintain, inspect or set up the tangible personal property.

“Load and leave” means delivery to the purchaser by use of a tangible storage media where the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to the purchaser;

“Mobility enhancing equipment” means equipment including its repair and replacement parts which:

Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one (1) place to another and which is appropriate for use either in a home or a motor vehicle;

Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility;

Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer;

Does not include “durable medical equipment”.

“Over-the-counter-drug” means a drug that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. § 201.66. The “over-the-counter-drug” label includes:

A drug facts panel; or

A statement of any active ingredient with a list of the ingredient contained in the compound, substance or preparation.

“Prescription” means an order, formula or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner as defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(xx);

“Prewritten computer software” means computer software including any prewritten upgrade, which is not designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser. The combining of two (2) or more prewritten computer software programs or prewritten portions thereof does not cause the combination to be other than prewritten computer software. Prewritten computer software includes software designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser when it is sold to a person other than the specific purchaser. Where a person modifies or enhances computer software of which the person is not the author or creator, the person shall be deemed to be the author or creator only of the person’s modifications or enhancements. Prewritten computer software or a prewritten portion thereof that is modified or enhanced to any degree, where the modification or enhancement is designed and developed to the specifications of a specific purchaser remains prewritten computer software. However, where there is a reasonable, separately stated charge or an invoice or other statement of the price given to the purchaser for the modification or enhancement, the modification or enhancement shall not constitute prewritten computer software;

“Prosthetic device” means a replacement, corrective or supportive device including repair and replacement parts for the device, worn on or in the body to:

Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;

Prevent or correct physical deformity or malfunction; or

Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.

Telecommunications definitions:

“800 service” means a telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for the call. The service is typically marketed under the name “800”, “855”, “866”, “877” and “888” toll-free calling, and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal Communications Commission;

“900 service” means an inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a subscriber that allows the subscriber’s customers to call in to the subscriber’s prerecorded announcement or live service. 900 service shall not include the charge for collection services provided by the seller of the telecommunications services to the subscriber or service or product sold by the subscriber to the subscriber’s customer. The service is typically marketed under the name “900” service, and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal Communications Commission;

“Ancillary services” means services that are associated with or incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including but not limited to detailed telecommunications billing, directory assistance, vertical service and voice mail services;

“Coin-operated telephone service” means a telecommunications service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct deposits of money to operate;

“Conference bridging service” means an ancillary service that links two (2) or more participants of an audio or video conference call and may include the provision of a telephone number. Conference bridging service shall not include the telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge;

“Detailed telecommunications billing service” means an ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to individual calls on a customer’s billing statement;

“Directory assistance” means an ancillary service of providing telephone number information or address information;

“Fixed wireless service” means a telecommunications service that provides radio communication between fixed points;

“International” means a telecommunications service that originates or terminates in the United States and terminates or originates outside the United States, respectively. United States includes the District of Columbia or a United States territory or possession;

“Interstate” means a telecommunications service that originates in one (1) state of the United States or a United States territory or possession, and terminates in a different state of the United States or a United States territory or possession;

“Intrastate” means a telecommunications service that originates in one (1) state of the United States or a United States territory or possession and terminates in the same state of the United States or a United States territory or possession;

“Mobile wireless service” means a telecommunications service that is transmitted, conveyed or routed regardless of the technology used, whereby the origination or termination points of the transmission, conveyance or routing are not fixed, including, by way of example only, telecommunications services that are provided by a commercial mobile radio service provider;

“Paging service” means a telecommunications service that provides transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of activating specific pagers, which transmissions may include messages or sounds;

“Pay telephone service” means a telecommunications service provided through any pay telephone;

“Prepaid calling service” means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services, which require advance payment and which enables the origination of call using an access number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;

“Prepaid wireless calling service” means a telecommunications service that provides the right to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services including the download of digital products delivered electronically, content and ancillary services, which require advance payment that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;

“Private communications service” means a telecommunications service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel or group of channels between or among termination points, regardless of the manner in which the channel or channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations and any other associated services that are provided in connection with the use of the channel or channels;

“Residential telecommunications service” means a telecommunications service or ancillary services provided to an individual for personal use at a residential address, including an individual dwelling unit such as an apartment. In the case of institutions where individuals reside such as schools or nursing homes, telecommunications service is considered residential if it is provided to and paid for by an individual resident rather than the institution;

“Telecommunications service” means the electronic transmission, conveyance or routing of voice, data, audio, video or any other information or signals to a point, or between or among points. The term telecommunications service includes such transmission, conveyance or routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, code or protocol of the content for purposes of transmission, conveyance or routing without regard to whether such service is referred to as voice over internet protocol services or is classified by the Federal Communications Commission as enhanced or value added. Telecommunications service shall not include:

Data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored, processed or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a purchaser where the purchaser’s primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information;

Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer’s premises;

Tangible personal property;

Advertising, including but not limited to directory advertising;

Billing and collection services provided to third parties;

Internet access service;

Radio and television audio and video programming services, regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance and routing of the services by the programming service provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services shall include but not be limited to cable service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3;

Ancillary services; or

Digital products delivered electronically including but not limited to software, music, video, reading materials or ring tones.

“Value-added nonvoice data service” means a service that otherwise meets the definition of telecommunications services in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code, or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose other than transmission, conveyance or routing;

“Vertical service” means an ancillary service that is offered in connection with one (1) or more telecommunications services, which offers advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and to manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging services;

“Voice mail service” means an ancillary service that enables the customer to store, send or receive recorded messages. Voice mail service does not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in order to utilize the voice mail service.

“Bundled transaction” means the retail sale of two (2) or more products, except real property and services to real property, where the products are otherwise distinct and identifiable, and the products are sold for one (1) nonitemized price. A bundled transaction does not include the sale of any products in which the sales price varies or is negotiable based on the selection by the purchaser of the products included in the transaction:

“Distinct and identifiable products” does not include:

Packaging such as containers, boxes, sacks, bags and bottles or other materials such as wrapping, labels, tags and instruction guides that accompany the retail sale of the products and are incidental or immaterial to the retail sale thereof;

A product provided free of charge with the required purchase of another product. A product is provided free of charge if the sales price of the product purchased does not vary depending on the inclusion of the product provided free of charge;

Items included in the definition of sales price.

“One (1) nonitemized price” does not include a price that is separately identified by product on a binding sales or other supporting sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or electronic form including, but not limited to an invoice, bill of sale, receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic notice of rates and services, rate card or price list;

A transaction that otherwise meets the definition of a bundled transaction as defined above, is not a bundled transaction if it is:

The retail sale of tangible personal property and a service where the tangible personal property is essential to the use of the service, and is provided exclusively in connection with the service, and the true object of the transaction is the service; or

The retail sale of services where one (1) service is provided that is essential to the use or receipt of a second service and the first service is provided exclusively in connection with the second service and the true object of the transaction is the second service; or

A transaction that includes taxable products and nontaxable products and the purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is de minimis. “De minimis” means the seller’s purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is ten percent (10%) or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled products. Sellers shall use either the purchase price or the sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. Sellers shall not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. Sellers shall use the full term of a service contract to determine if the taxable products are de minimis; or

The retail sale of exempt tangible personal property and taxable tangible personal property where:

(1)

The transaction includes food and food ingredients, drugs, durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, over the counter drugs, prosthetic devices or medical supplies; and

(2)

Where the seller’s purchase price or sales price of the taxable tangible personal property is fifty percent (50%) or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled tangible personal property. Sellers shall not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the tangible personal property when making the fifty percent (50%) determination of the transaction.

When a bundled transaction includes a telecommunications service, ancillary service, internet access or audio or video programming service:

If the price of the bundle is attributable to products that are taxable and products that are nontaxable, the portion of the price attributable to the nontaxable products may be subject to tax unless the provider can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards such portion from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes, including, but not limited to nontax purposes;

If the price of the bundle is attributable to products that are subject to tax at different rates, the total price may be treated as attributable to the products subject to tax at the highest rate unless the provider can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards the portion of the price attributable to the products subject to tax at the lower rate from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of business for other purposes, including, but not limited to nontax purposes.

“Food for domestic home consumption” means substances whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried or dehydrated form that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. “Food for domestic home consumption” does not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco or prepared foods;

“Direct mail” means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. “Direct mail” includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. “Direct mail” does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;

“Specified digital products” means electronically transferred:

“Digital audio-visual works” which means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any;

“Digital audio works” which means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken or other sounds, including ringtones; or

“Digital books” which means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.

“Data processing services center” means a business or business unit which is primarily engaged in providing infrastructure to house a group of network server computers and associated network storage devices in one (1) physical location in order to centralize one (1) or more of the following: storage, management, processing or dissemination of data and information pertaining to a particular business, taxonomy or body of knowledge. The business may provide specialized hosting activities such as web hosting, streaming services or application hosting; application service provisioning; or general time-share mainframe facilities to itself or to its clients. The client of a data processing services center may be a person or company not affiliated with the data processing services center or other business unit within the business entity which owns the data processing services center;

“Qualifying computer equipment” means tangible personal property eligible for the exemption provided by W.S.

39-15-105

(a)(viii)(S). The term shall include computers, servers, monitors, keyboards, storage devices and other peripherals, racking systems, cabling and trays necessary for the operation of the data processing services center;

“Prepared food”:

Includes:

Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

Two (2) or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item; or

Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins or straws. A container or package used to transport the food is not an eating utensil.

Does not include:

Food that is only cut, repackaged or pasteurized by the seller;

Eggs, fish, meat, poultry or foods containing raw animal foods and which are required or recommended to be cooked by the consumer to prevent food borne illness;

Food sold by a seller whose proper primary NAICS classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118 dealing with bakeries;

Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item; or

Bakery items including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danishes, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, tortillas and other bakery goods unless the item is sold as prepared food under subdivision (xlvi)(A)(III) of this subsection.

“Exempt motor vehicle” means any motor vehicle that is exempt from taxation under W.S. 39-15-105. Upon transfer of title of an exempt motor vehicle, a county treasurer shall provide an applicant documentation noting any valid sales tax exemption and a receipt specifying the amount of sales tax collected.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 77, § 1; 1999, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 132, § 1; 2000, ch. 79, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 37, § 1; ch. 48, § 1; 2004, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 31, § 1; 2006, ch. 10, § 1; 2007, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; ch. 140, § 1; 2008, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 151, § 1; ch. 170, § 2; 2010, ch. 50, § 1; 2011, ch. 34, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2015 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 85, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 87, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(xix) through (xxii).

The 2005 amendments. —

The first
2005 amendment, by ch. 5, §
2, rewrote (a)(ix); and added (a)(xxiii) through (a)(xxxviii).

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The second
2005 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, substituted “2002” for “2003” in (a)(xxii).

Laws 2005, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, deleted “title or” preceding “possession” in the introductory paragraph of (a)(vii).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first
2007 amendment, by ch. 10, §§ 1 and 2, effective January 1, 2008, repealed (a)(viii)(A)(VI), which read: “The value of exempt personal property given to the purchaser where taxable and exempt personal property have been bundled together and sold by the seller as a single product or piece of merchandise.” and added (a)(viii)(C), (xxxix) and (xl).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(xvii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

added (a)(viii)(C)(III); added the (a)(viii)(C)(IV) designation; added (a)(xlii); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 34, §
2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, 151, § 1, effective January 1, 2010, added (a)(xliii).

The second 2009 amendment, by
Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(iii), which read: “‘Population’ means the population as determined by the last federal census to become effective on July 1, next following the receipt of the official census figures.”

The 2010 amendment

added (a)(xliv) and (a)(xlv).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xli), substituted the first sentence for the former first sentence which read: “‘Food’ means food for domestic home consumption as defined by department rule and regulation,” and added the second sentence; and added (a)(xlvi).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “or dollars” for “of dollars” in (a)(xxxix)(R).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 44, §
1, effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a)(vii), inserted “or lessor”; added present (a)(vii)(M) and redesignated former (a)(vii)(M) as (a)(vii)(N); and in (a)(vii)(N), substituted “subparagraphs (M) and (N) of this section” for “this subparagraph.”

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 61 § 1, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a)(xviii), which formerly read: “‘Well site’” means an area within a two hundred fifty (250) foot radius of an oil or gas wellbore.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xv) added “and a remote seller to the extent provided by
W.S.

39-15-501

” to the end of the sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
in (a)(xxxi)(A), inserted “specie and specie legal tender
as
provided in W.S.

9-4-1304

.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, added “and a marketplace facilitator to the extent provided by W.S.

39-15-502

” in (a)(xv).
